Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8367.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Post-acute care prior authorization.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Post-acute care services” means specialized behavioral, medical, rehabilitative, or
homecare services provided to a patient discharged from an acute care hospital to improve the
patient’s functional independence and manage the patient’s ongoing health conditions.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for post-acute care
services, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, for a minimum of seven (7) days and shall not
be subject to preauthorization prior to obtaining post-acute care services; provided, the discharging
hospital shall provide the insurer with notification prior to discharge and admission to post-acute
care; provided further, the utilization review procedures may be initiated on day seven (7). Medical
necessity shall be determined by the treating healthcare provider and shall be noted in the patient’s
medical record and discharge plan.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Post-acute care prior authorization.

(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Post-acute care services” means specialized behavioral, medical, rehabilitative, or
homecare services provided to a patient discharged from an acute care hospital to improve the
patient’s functional independence and manage the patient’s ongoing health conditions.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for post-acute care
services, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, for a minimum of seven (7) days and shall not
be subject to preauthorization prior to obtaining post-acute care services; provided, the discharging
hospital shall provide the insurer with notification prior to discharge and admission to post-acute
care; provided further, the utilization review procedures may be initiated on day seven (7). Medical
necessity shall be determined by the treating healthcare provider and shall be noted in the patient’s
medical record and discharge plan.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Post-acute care prior authorization.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Post-acute care services” means specialized behavioral, medical, rehabilitative, or
homecare services provided to a patient discharged from an acute care hospital to improve the
patient’s functional independence and manage the patient’s ongoing health conditions.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for post-acute care
services, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, for a minimum of seven (7) days and shall not
be subject to preauthorization prior to obtaining post-acute care services; provided, the discharging
hospital shall provide the insurer with notification prior to discharge and admission to post-acute
care; provided further, the utilization review procedures may be initiated on day seven (7). Medical
necessity shall be determined by the treating healthcare provider and shall be noted in the patient’s
medical record and discharge plan.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Post-acute care prior authorization.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Post-acute care services” means specialized behavioral, medical, rehabilitative, or
LC006194 - Page 2 of 4

homecare services provided to a patient discharged from an acute care hospital to improve the
patient’s functional independence and manage the patient’s ongoing health conditions.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for post-acute care
services, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, for a minimum of seven (7) days and shall not
be subject to preauthorization prior to obtaining post-acute care services; provided, the discharging
hospital shall provide the insurer with notification prior to discharge and admission to post-acute
care; provided further, the utilization review procedures may be initiated on day seven (7). Medical
necessity shall be determined by the treating healthcare provider and shall be noted in the patient’s
medical record and discharge plan.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006194
========
LC006194 - Page 3 of 4